Alabama, session 2026rs, SB69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-18-3, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§40-18-3
(a) The salaries, fees, commissions, or other income of
officers or agents of the United States or its agencies and
instrumentalities or its contractees, received from the United
States or from its agencies and instrumentalities, shall be
Page 1

States or from its agencies and instrumentalities, shall be
SB69 INTRODUCED
subject to income taxes levied by the State of Alabama as
other income is taxed, but without discrimination, and only to
the same extent and in the same manner as other income is
taxed, insofar as the State of Alabama may be constitutionally
or legally authorized to tax such income; provided, that.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), money paid by the
United States to a personan individual as compensation as a
civilian employee of the U.S. Department of Defense or Armed
Forces, or for active service as a member of the armed
forcesArmed Forces of the United States, including members of
the National Guard and Reserve components, shall not be
subject to income taxes levied by the State of Alabama, for
compensation earned while the individual is:
(1) Inin a combat zone designated by an executive order
of the President of the United States,;
(2) Deployeddeployed to locations outside the United
States,; or
(3) Activatedactivated by the Governor of the State of
Alabama or the President of the United States to support state
or federal response to emergencies within or outside of the
United States shall not be subject to income taxes levied by
the State of Alabama. "
Section 2. The provisions of this act shall apply to
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 2